Nebraska, session 109, LB1236A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $25,000 from the Nebraska
Statutes Distribution Cash Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $25,000 from the Nebraska
Statutes Distribution Cash Fund for FY2027-28 to the Legislative Council, for
Program 123, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1236,
One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-